Arkansas, session 2025, SB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-316(a), concerning the income tax
exemption allowed for disaster relief payments and rebates, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed under
this chapter for:
(1) Payments made to a taxpayer by the United States Department
of Agriculture under the Market Facilitation Program authorized by 15 U.S.C.
§ 714c, as it existed on January 1, 2020; and
(2) Recovery rebates provided by the United States Department of
the Treasury under Section 2201 of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic
Security Act, Pub. L. No. 116-136; and
(3) Payments made to a taxpayer by the United States Department
of Agriculture under programs authorized by Division B, Title I, of the
American Relief Act of 2025, Pub. L. No. 118-158.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
*JLL282*
03/07/2025 3:18:49 PM JLL282

SB408
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



































03/07/2025 3:18:49 PM JLL282